New York, session 2025-2026, A6858.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 397-a of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. It shall be unlawful to operate upon any public highway in this 4 state a motor vehicle which is equipped with a radar detector or laser 5 detector commonly known as a phazer II device. The presence in such 6 vehicle of a phazer II device connected to a power source and in an 7 operable condition is presumptive evidence of its use by any person 8 operating such vehicle. Such presumption shall be rebutted by any credi- 9 ble and reliable evidence which tends to show that such device was not 10 in use. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09302-01-5